Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Article 17. Right-of-Way.

§ 63-3-801.
Vehicle approaching intersection; vehicles entering intersection at same time.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this article, the driver of a vehicle approaching an intersection shall yield the right-of-way to a vehicle which has entered the intersection from a different highway.

Except as may otherwise be provided in this article, when two vehicles enter an intersection from different highways at the same time the driver of the vehicle on the left shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle on the right.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8195; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-803.
Vehicle turning left at intersection.

The driver of a vehicle within an intersection intending to turn to the left shall yield the right-of-way to any vehicle approaching from the opposite direction which is within the intersection or so close thereto as to constitute an immediate hazard. However, said driver, having so yielded and having given a signal when and as required by Article 15, may make such left turn and the drivers of all other vehicles approaching the intersection from said opposite direction shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle making the left turn.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8196; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-805.
Vehicle entering through highway.

The driver of a vehicle shall stop as required by this chapter at the entrance to a through highway and shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles which have entered the intersection from said through highway or which are approaching so closely on said through highway as to constitute an immediate hazard. However, said driver having so yielded may proceed and the drivers of all other vehicles approaching the intersection on said through highway shall yield the right-of-way to the vehicle so proceeding into or across the through highway.

The driver of a vehicle shall likewise stop in obedience to a stop sign as required by this chapter at an intersection where a stop sign is erected at one or more entrances thereto although not a part of a through highway and shall proceed cautiously, yielding to vehicles not so obliged to stop which are within the intersection or approaching so closely as to constitute an immediate hazard, but may then proceed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8197; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-807.
Vehicle entering or crossing highway from private road or driveway.

The driver of a vehicle about to enter or cross a highway from a private road or driveway shall yield the right-of-way to all vehicles approaching on said highway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8198; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-809.
Procedure upon approach of authorized emergency vehicles; procedure upon approaching certain stationary vehicles using authorized flashing lights; duty of driver of authorized emergency, recovery or utility service vehicle.

Upon the immediate approach of an authorized emergency vehicle, when the driver is giving audible signal by siren, exhaust whistle, or bell, the driver of every other vehicle shall yield the right-of-way and shall immediately drive to a position parallel to, and as close as possible to, the right-hand edge or curb of the roadway clear of any intersection and shall stop and remain in such position until the authorized emergency vehicle has passed, except when otherwise directed by a law enforcement officer.

Upon approaching a stationary authorized emergency vehicle, when such vehicle is giving a signal by use of flashing, blinking, oscillating or rotating lights, as authorized under Section 63-7-19, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall:

Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to that of the authorized emergency vehicle, if possible with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or

Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe.

Upon approaching a stationary recovery vehicle, utility service vehicle, sanitation vehicle, or highway maintenance vehicle, when the stationary vehicle is giving a signal by use of authorized flashing lights, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall:

Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or

Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe.

For purposes of this section, unless the context otherwise clearly requires:

“Highway maintenance vehicle” means a vehicle used for the maintenance of highways and roadways in this state and is:

Owned or operated by the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or

Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with the Department of Transportation, a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state.

“Recovery vehicle” means a truck that is specifically designed for towing a disabled vehicle or a combination of vehicles.

“Utility service vehicle” means a vehicle used by any person, municipality, county, electric cooperative, corporation, board, commission, district or any entity created or authorized by public act, private act or general law to provide electricity, natural gas, water, wastewater services, telecommunications services or any combination thereof, for sale to consumers in any particular service area, or by any contractor under contract with any such entity.

“Sanitation vehicle” means a vehicle used to collect solid waste, refuse or recyclable material that is:

Owned or operated by a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state; or

Owned or operated by a contractor under contract with a county, a municipality or other political subdivision of this state.

Upon approaching a vehicle that is marked with some combination of white flashing strobe or amber and red lights, as provided in Section 63-7-19, that is operated by a United States rural mail carrier for the purpose of delivering United States mail, and that is stationary, including when the vehicle is signaling the intention to enter the roadway, a person who drives an approaching vehicle shall:

Proceeding with due caution, yield the right-of-way by making a lane change into a lane not adjacent to the stationary vehicle, if possible, with due regard to safety and traffic conditions, if on a roadway having at least four (4) lanes with not less than two (2) lanes proceeding in the same direction as the approaching vehicle; or

Proceeding with due caution, reduce the speed of the vehicle, maintaining a safe speed for road conditions and being prepared to stop, if changing lanes would be impossible or unsafe.

A violation of this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine:

Of not more than Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00); or

Of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) if violation of this section results in:

Property damage to the emergency vehicle, sanitation vehicle, highway maintenance vehicle, utility service vehicle, recovery vehicle or rural mail carrier vehicle; or

Bodily injury to the driver or a passenger of any such vehicle.

This section shall not operate to relieve the driver of an authorized emergency vehicle, a sanitation vehicle, a recovery vehicle, a utility service vehicle, a highway maintenance vehicle or a rural mail carrier vehicle from the duty to drive with due regard for the safety of all persons using the roadway.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8199; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 2007, ch. 315, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 412, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 314, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 355, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.